Missouri, session 2026, HB1888.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 452.705, 452.730, 452.885, and 487.110, RSMo, are repealed and
thirty-seven new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 452.705, 452.730,
452.885, 452.1100, 452.1102, 452.1104, 452.1106, 452.1108, 452.1110, 452.1112, 452.1114,
452.1118, 452.1120, 452.1122, 453.700, 453.702, 453.704, 453.706, 453.708, 453.710,
453.712, 453.714, 453.716, 453.718, 453.720, 453.722, 453.724, 453.726, 453.728, 453.730,
453.732, 453.734, 453.736, 453.738, 453.740, 453.742, and 487.110, to read as follows:
452.705. As used in sections 452.700 to 452.930:
(1) "Abandoned" means left without provision for reasonable and necessary care or
supervision;
(2) "Child" means an individual who has not attained eighteen years of age;
(3) "Child custody determination" means a judgment, decree, or other order of a court
providing for the legal custody, physical custody, or visitation with respect to a child. The
term includes a permanent, temporary, initial, or modification order. The term shall not
include an order relating to child support or other monetary obligation of an individual;
(4) "Child custody proceeding" means a proceeding in which legal custody, physical
custody, or visitation with respect to a child is an issue. The term includes a proceeding for
divorce, separation, neglect, abuse, dependency, guardianship, paternity, termination of
parental rights, and protection from domestic violence in which the issue may appear. The
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1888 2
term shall not include a proceeding involving juvenile delinquency, contractual emancipation,
or enforcement under sections 452.850 to 452.915;
(5) "Commencement" means the filing of the first pleading in a proceeding;
(6) "Court" means an entity authorized under the law of a state to establish, enforce,
or modify a child custody determination;
(7) "Decree" or "custody decree" means a custody determination contained in a
judicial decree or order made in a custody proceeding, and includes an initial decree and a
modification decree;
(8) "Home state" means the state in which a child has lived with a parent or a person
acting as a parent for at least six consecutive months immediately prior to the commencement
of a child custody proceeding. In the case of a child less than six months of age, the term
means the state in which the child has lived from birth with any of the persons mentioned. A
period of temporary absence of any of the mentioned persons is part of such period;
(9) "Initial determination" means the first child custody determination concerning a
particular child;
(10) "Issuing court" means the court making a child custody determination for which
enforcement is sought under sections 452.700 to 452.930;
(11) "Issuing state" means the state in which a child custody determination is made;
(12) "Litigant" means a person, including a parent, grandparent, or stepparent, who
claims a right to custody or visitation with respect to a child;
(13) "Modification" means a child custody determination that changes, replaces,
supersedes or is otherwise made after a previous determination concerning the same child,
whether or not it is made by the court that made the previous determination;
(14) "Person" includes government, a governmental subdivision, agency or
instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity;
(15) "Person acting as a parent" means a person, other than a parent, who:
(a) Has physical custody of the child or has had physical custody for a period of six
consecutive months, including any temporary absence, within one year immediately prior to
the commencement of a child custody proceeding; and
(b) Has been awarded legal custody by a court or claims a right to legal custody under
the law of this state;
(16) "Physical custody" means the physical care and supervision of a child;
(17) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico,
the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the
jurisdiction of the United States;
(18) "Warrant" means an order issued by a court authorizing law enforcement officers
to take physical custody of a child;

HB 1888 3
(19) "Wrongful removal" means the taking of a child that breaches rights of
custody or visitation given or recognized under the laws of this state.
452.730. 1. A court of this state may communicate with a court in another state
concerning a proceeding arising under sections 452.700 to 452.930 or arising under sections
452.1100 to 452.1122.
2. The court may allow the parties to participate in the communication. If the parties
are not able to participate in the communication, the parties shall be given the opportunity to
present facts and legal arguments before a decision on jurisdiction is made.
3. A communication between courts on schedules, calendars, court records, and
similar matters may occur without informing the parties. A record need not be made of such
communication.
4. Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section, a record shall be made of the
communication. The parties shall be informed promptly of the communication and granted
access to the record.
5. For the purposes of this section, "record" means information that is inscribed on a
tangible medium, or that which is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in
perceivable form. A record includes notes or transcripts of a court reporter who listened to a
conference call between the courts, an electronic recording of a telephone call, a
memorandum or an electronic record of the communication between the courts, or a
memorandum or an electronic record made by a court after the communication.
452.885. 1. (1) Upon the filing of a petition seeking enforcement of a child custody
determination[, the petitioner may file] with a verified application for the issuance of a
warrant to take physical custody of the child or upon the filing of a petition under sections
452.1100 to 452.1122, the court may issue an ex parte warrant to take physical custody
of the child if the court finds, upon review of the petition or verified application or upon
the testimony of the petitioner or other witnesses, that the child is likely to suffer serious
imminent physical harm or there is a credible risk that the child is imminently likely to
suffer wrongful removal [from this state].
(2) Prior to issuing a warrant in response to a petition filed under sections
452.1100 to 452.1122 and before determining the placement of the child after the
warrant is executed, the court may order a search of the relevant databases of the
National Crime Information Center system and similar state databases to determine if
the petitioner or respondent has a history of domestic violence, stalking, or child abuse
or neglect.
2. [If the court, upon the testimony of the petitioner or other witnesses, finds that the
child is likely to suffer serious imminent physical harm or be imminently removed from this
state, the court may issue a warrant to take physical custody of the child. The petition shall be

HB 1888 4
heard on the next judicial day after the warrant is executed. The warrant shall include the
statements required under subsection 2 of section 452.870.
3.] A warrant to take physical custody of a child shall:
(1) Recite the facts upon which a [conclusion] determination of serious imminent
physical harm or a credible risk of imminent wrongful removal from the jurisdiction is
based;
(2) Direct law enforcement officers to take physical custody of the child immediately;
[and]
(3) State the date and time for the hearing on the petition;
(4) Provide for the safe interim placement of the child pending further order of the
court or final relief; and
(5) Include the statements required under subsection 2 of section 452.870 if a
warrant is issued in response to a petition seeking enforcement of a child custody
determination.
[4.] 3. The respondent shall be served with the petition, warrant and order
immediately after the child is taken into physical custody.
4. The respondent shall be afforded an opportunity to be heard at the earliest
possible time after the ex parte warrant is executed but no later than the next judicial
day unless a hearing on that date is impossible. In that event, the court shall hold the
hearing on the first judicial day possible.
5. If the court finds, after a hearing, that a petitioner sought a warrant under
subsection 1 of this section for the purpose of harassment or in bad faith, the court may
award the respondent reasonable attorney's fees, costs, and expenses.
[5.] 6. A warrant to take physical custody of a child is enforceable throughout this
state. If the court finds on the basis of the testimony of the petitioner or other witness that a
less intrusive remedy is not effective, the court may authorize law enforcement officers to
enter private property to take physical custody of the child. If required by the exigency of the
case, the court may authorize law enforcement officers to make a forcible entry at any hour.
[6.] 7. The court may impose conditions on the placement of a child to ensure the
appearance of the child and the child's custodian.
8. This section does not affect the availability of relief allowed under the laws of
this state other than sections 452.700 to 452.930 and sections 452.1100 to 452.1122.
452.1100. Sections 452.1100 to 452.1122 may be cited as the "Uniform Child
Abduction Prevention Act".
452.1102. In sections 452.1100 to 452.1122:
(1) "Abduction" means the wrongful removal or wrongful retention of a child;

HB 1888 5
(2) "Child" means an unemancipated individual who is less than eighteen years
of age;
(3) "Child abduction prevention measures" means measures and conditions that
are reasonably calculated to prevent the abduction of a child, including provisions of
subsections 3, 4, and 5 of section 452.1114, and other measures that the court deems
appropriate to prevent the abduction of a child;
(4) "Child-custody determination" means a judgment, decree, or other order of
a court providing for the legal custody, physical custody, or visitation with respect to a
child. The term includes a permanent, temporary, initial, and modification order;
(5) "Child custody proceeding" means a proceeding in which legal custody,
physical custody, or visitation with respect to a child is at issue. The term includes a
proceeding for divorce, dissolution of marriage, separation, neglect, abuse, dependency,
guardianship, paternity, termination of parental rights, or protection from domestic
violence;
(6) "Court" means an entity authorized under the law of a state to establish,
enforce, or modify a child-custody determination;
(7) "Petition" includes a motion or its equivalent;
(8) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that
is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;
(9) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto
Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to
the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes a federally recognized Indian
tribe or nation;
(10) "Travel document" means records relating to a travel itinerary, including
travel tickets, passes, reservations for transportation, or accommodations. The term
does not include a passport or visa;
(11) "Warrant" means an order issued by a court authorizing law enforcement
officers to take physical custody of a child;
(12) "Wrongful removal" means the taking of a child that breaches rights of
custody or visitation given or recognized under the law of this state;
(13) "Wrongful retention" means the keeping or concealing of a child that
breaches rights of custody or visitation given or recognized under the law of this state.
452.1104. Sections 452.730, 452.735, and 452.820 of the uniform child custody
jurisdiction and enforcement act apply to cooperation and communications among
courts in proceedings under sections 452.1100 to 452.1122.

HB 1888 6
452.1106. 1. A court on its own motion may order abduction prevention
measures in a child custody proceeding if the court finds that the evidence establishes a
credible risk of abduction of the child.
2. A party to a child custody determination or another individual or entity
having a right under the law of this state or any other state to seek a child custody
determination for the child may file a petition seeking abduction prevention measures to
protect the child under sections 452.1100 to 452.1122.
3. A prosecutor or public authority designated under section 452.910 may seek a
warrant to take physical custody of a child under section 452.885 or other appropriate
prevention measures.
452.1108. 1. A petition under sections 452.1100 to 452.1122 may be filed only in a
court that has jurisdiction to make a child custody determination with respect to the
child at issue under sections 452.700 to 452.930.
2. A court of this state has temporary emergency jurisdiction under section
452.755 if the court finds a credible risk of abduction.
452.1110. A petition under sections 452.1100 to 452.1122 must be verified and
include a copy of any existing child custody determination, if available. The petition
must specify the risk factors for abduction, including the relevant factors described in
section 452.1112. Subject to subsection 5 of section 452.780, if reasonably ascertainable,
the petition must contain:
(1) The name, date of birth, and sex of the child;
(2) The customary address and current physical location of the child;
(3) The identity, customary address, and current physical location of the
respondent;
(4) A statement of whether a prior action to prevent abduction or domestic
violence has been filed by a party or other individual or entity having custody of the
child, and the date, location, and disposition of the action;
(5) A statement of whether a party to the proceeding has been arrested for a
crime related to domestic violence, stalking, or child abuse or neglect, and the date,
location, and disposition of the case; and
(6) Any other information required to be submitted to the court for a child
custody determination under section 452.780.
452.1112. 1. In determining whether there is a credible risk of abduction of a
child, the court shall consider any evidence that the petitioner or respondent:
(1) Has previously abducted or attempted to abduct the child;
(2) Has threatened to abduct the child;

HB 1888 7
(3) Has recently engaged in activities that may indicate a planned abduction,
including:
(a) Abandoning employment;
(b) Selling a primary residence;
(c) Terminating a lease;
(d) Closing bank or other financial management accounts, liquidating assets,
hiding or destroying financial documents, or conducting any unusual financial
activities;
(e) Applying for a passport or visa or obtaining travel documents for the
respondent, a family member, or the child; or
(f) Seeking to obtain the child's birth certificate or school or medical records;
(4) Has engaged in domestic violence, stalking, or child abuse or neglect;
(5) Has refused to follow a child custody determination;
(6) Lacks strong familial, financial, emotional, or cultural ties to the state or the
United States;
(7) Has strong familial, financial, emotional, or cultural ties to another state or
country;
(8) Is likely to take the child to a country that:
(a) Is not a party to the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International
Child Abduction and does not provide for the extradition of an abducting parent or for
the return of an abducted child;
(b) Is a party to the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International
Child Abduction but:
a. The Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction
is not in force between the United States and that country;
b. Is noncompliant according to the most recent compliance report issued by the
United States Department of State; or
c. Lacks legal mechanisms for immediately and effectively enforcing a return
order under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child
Abduction;
(c) Poses a risk that the child's physical or emotional health or safety would be
endangered in the country because of specific circumstances relating to the child or
because of human rights violations committed against children;
(d) Has laws or practices that would:
a. Enable the respondent, without due cause, to prevent the petitioner from
contacting the child;

HB 1888 8
b. Restrict the petitioner from freely traveling to or exiting from the country
because of the petitioner’s sex, nationality, marital status, or religion; or
c. Restrict the child's ability legally to leave the country after the child reaches
the age of majority because of a child's sex, nationality, or religion;
(e) Is included by the United States Department of State on a current list of state
sponsors of terrorism;
(f) Does not have an official United States diplomatic presence in the country; or
(g) Is engaged in active military action or war, including a civil war, to which the
child may be exposed;
(9) Is undergoing a change in immigration or citizenship status that would
adversely affect the respondent's ability to remain in the United States legally;
(10) Has had an application for United States citizenship denied;
(11) Has forged or presented misleading or false evidence on government forms
or supporting documents to obtain or attempt to obtain a passport, a visa, travel
documents, a Social Security card, a driver’s license, or other government-issued
identification card or has made a misrepresentation to the United States government;
(12) Has used multiple names to attempt to mislead or defraud; or
(13) Has engaged in any other conduct the court considers relevant to the risk of
abduction.
2. In the hearing on a petition under sections 452.1100 to 452.1122, the court
shall consider any evidence that the respondent believed in good faith that the
respondent's conduct was necessary to avoid imminent harm to the child or respondent
and any other evidence that may be relevant to whether the respondent may be
permitted to remove or retain the child.
452.1114. 1. If a petition is filed under sections 452.1100 to 452.1122, the court
may enter an order that must include:
(1) The basis for the court's exercise of jurisdiction;
(2) The manner in which notice and opportunity to be heard were given to the
persons entitled to notice of the proceeding;
(3) A detailed description of each party's custody and visitation rights and
residential arrangements for the child;
(4) A provision stating that a violation of the order may subject the party in
violation to civil and criminal penalties; and
(5) Identification of the child's country of habitual residence at the time of the
issuance of the order.
2. If, at a hearing on a petition under sections 452.1100 to 452.1122 or on the
court's own motion, the court after reviewing the evidence finds a credible risk of

HB 1888 9
abduction of the child, the court shall enter an abduction prevention order. The order
must include the provisions required by subsection 1 of this section and measures and
conditions, including those in subsections 3, 4, and 5 of this section, that are reasonably
calculated to prevent abduction of the child, giving due consideration to the potential
harm to the child from an abduction, the legal and practical difficulties of returning the
child to the jurisdiction if abducted, and the reasons for the potential abduction,
including evidence of domestic violence, stalking, or child abuse or neglect.
3. An abduction prevention order may include one or more of the following:
(1) An imposition of travel restrictions that require that a party traveling with
the child outside a designated geographical area provide the other party with the
following:
(a) The travel itinerary of the child;
(b) A list of physical addresses and telephone numbers at which the child can be
reached at specified times; and
(c) Copies of all travel documents;
(2) A prohibition of the respondent directly or indirectly:
(a) Removing the child from this state, the United States, or another geographic
area without permission of the court or the petitioner's written consent;
(b) Removing or retaining the child in violation of a child custody
determination;
(c) Removing the child from school or a child care or similar facility; or
(d) Approaching the child at any location other than a site designated for
supervised visitation;
(3) A requirement that a party register the order in another state as a
prerequisite to allowing the child to travel to that state;
(4) With regard to the child's passport:
(a) A direction that the petitioner place the child's name in the United States
Department of State's Child Passport Issuance Alert Program;
(b) A requirement that the respondent surrender to the court or the petitioner's
attorney any United States or foreign passport issued in the child's name, including a
passport issued in the name of both the parent and the child; and
(c) A prohibition upon the respondent from applying on behalf of the child for a
new or replacement passport or visa;
(5) As a prerequisite to exercising custody or visitation, a requirement that the
respondent provide:

HB 1888 10
(a) To the United States Department of State Office of Children's Issues and the
relevant foreign consulate or embassy, an authenticated copy of the order detailing
passport and travel restrictions for the child;
(b) To the court:
a. Proof that the respondent has provided the information in paragraph (a) of
this subdivision; and
b. An acknowledgment in a record from the relevant foreign consulate or
embassy that no passport application has been made, or passport issued, on behalf of the
child;
(c) To the petitioner, proof of registration with the United States Embassy or
other United States diplomatic presence in the destination country and with the Central
Authority for the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child
Abduction, if that Convention is in effect between the United States and the destination
country, unless one of the parties objects; and
(d) A written waiver under 5 U.S.C. Section 552a of the Privacy Act of 1974, as
amended, with respect to any document, application, or other information pertaining to
the child authorizing its disclosure to the court and the petitioner; and
(6) Upon the petitioner's request, a requirement that the respondent obtain an
order from the relevant foreign country containing terms identical to the child custody
determination issued in the United States.
4. In an abduction prevention order, the court may impose conditions on the
exercise of custody or visitation that:
(1) Limit visitation or require that visitation with the child by the respondent be
supervised until the court finds that supervision is no longer necessary and order the
respondent to pay the costs of supervision;
(2) Require the respondent to post a bond or provide other security in an
amount sufficient to serve as a financial deterrent to abduction, the proceeds of which
may be used to pay for the reasonable expenses of recovery of the child, including
reasonable attorneys' fees and costs if there is an abduction; and
(3) Require the respondent to obtain education on the potentially harmful effects
to the child from abduction.
5. To prevent imminent abduction of a child, a court may:
(1) Issue a warrant to take physical custody of the child;
(2) Direct the use of law enforcement to take any action reasonably necessary to
locate the child, obtain return of the child, or enforce a custody determination under
sections 452.1100 to 452.1122 or the law of this state other than sections 452.1100 to
452.1122; or

HB 1888 11
(3) Grant any other relief allowed under the law of this state other than sections
452.1100 to 452.1122.
6. The remedies provided in sections 452.1100 to 452.1122 are cumulative and do
not affect the availability of other remedies to prevent abduction.
452.1118. An abduction prevention order remains in effect until the earliest of:
(1) The time stated in the order;
(2) The emancipation of the child;
(3) The child's attaining eighteen years of age; or
(4) The time the order is modified, revoked, vacated, or superseded by a court
with jurisdiction under sections 452.740, 452.745, and 452.750 and applicable law of this
state.
452.1120. In applying and construing sections 452.1100 to 452.1122,
consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with
respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.
452.1122. Sections 452.1100 to 452.1122 modify, limit, and supersede the federal
Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001, et
seq., but do not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of the act, 15 U.S.C. Section
7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b)
of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b).
453.700. Sections 453.700 to 453.740 may be cited as the "Uniform Unregulated
Child Custody Transfer Act".
453.702. In sections 453.700 to 453.740:
(1) "Child" means an unemancipated individual under eighteen years of age;
(2) "Child-placing agency" means a person with authority under other law of
this state to identify or place a child for adoption. The term does not include a parent of
the child;
(3) "Custody" means the exercise of physical care and supervision of a child;
(4) "Intercountry adoption" means an adoption or placement for adoption of a
child who resides in a foreign country at the time of adoption or placement. The term
includes an adoption finalized in the child's country of residence or in a state;
(5) "Parent" means an individual recognized as a parent under other law of this
state;
(6) "Person" means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity, public
corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or
other legal entity;
(7) "Record" means information:
(a) Inscribed on a tangible medium; or

HB 1888 12
(b) Stored in an electronic or other medium and retrievable in perceivable form;
(8) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto
Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any other territory or possession subject to the
jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes a federally recognized Indian tribe.
453.704. Sections 453.700 to 453.740 do not apply to custody of an Indian child,
as defined in Section 4(4) of the Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978, 25 U.S.C. Section
1903(4), as amended, to the extent custody is governed by the Indian Child Welfare Act
of 1978, 25 U.S.C. Sections 1901 through 1963, as amended.
453.706. In sections 453.706 to 453.716:
(1) "Guardian" means a person recognized as a guardian under other law of this
state;
(2) "Intermediary" means a person that assists or facilitates a transfer of
custody of a child, whether or not for compensation.
453.708. Sections 453.706 to 453.716 do not apply to a transfer of custody of a
child by a parent or guardian of the child to:
(1) A parent of the child;
(2) A stepparent of the child;
(3) An adult who is related to the child by blood, marriage, or adoption;
(4) An adult who, at the time of the transfer, had a close relationship with the
child or the parent or guardian of the child for a substantial period, and whom the
parent or guardian reasonably believes, at the time of the transfer, to be a fit custodian
of the child;
(5) An Indian custodian, as defined in Section 4(6) of the Indian Child Welfare
Act of 1978, 25 U.S.C. Section 1903(6), as amended, of the child; or
(6) A member of the child's customary family unit recognized by the child's
indigenous group under other law of this state.
453.710. 1. Except as provided in subsection 2 of this section, a parent or
guardian of a child or an individual with whom a child has been placed for adoption
may not transfer custody of the child to another person with the intent, at the time of the
transfer, to abandon the rights and responsibilities concerning the child.
2. A parent or guardian of a child or an individual with whom a child has been
placed for adoption may transfer custody of the child to another person with the intent,
at the time of the transfer, to abandon the rights and responsibilities concerning the
child only through:
(1) Adoption or guardianship;
(2) Judicial award of custody;
(3) Placement by or through a child-placing agency;

HB 1888 13
(4) Other judicial or tribal action; or
(5) Safe place for newborns act of 2002 under section 210.950.
3. A person may not receive custody of a child, or act as an intermediary in a
transfer of custody of a child, if the person knows or reasonably should know the
transfer violates subsection 1 of this section. This prohibition does not apply if the
person, as soon as practicable after the transfer, notifies the children's division of the
transfer or takes appropriate action to establish custody under subsection 2 of this
section.
4. Violation of this section is a class B misdemeanor.
5. Violation of subsection 1 of this section is not established solely because a
parent or guardian that transfers custody of a child does not regain custody.
453.712. 1. If the children's division has a reasonable basis to believe that a
person has transferred or will transfer custody of a child in violation of subsection 1 of
section 453.710, the children's division may conduct a home visit as provided by other
law of this state and take appropriate action to protect the welfare of the child.
2. If the children's division conducts a home visit for a child adopted or placed
through an intercountry adoption, the children's division shall:
(1) Prepare a report on the welfare and plan for permanent placement of the
child; and
(2) Provide a copy to the United States Department of State.
3. Sections 453.700 to 453.740 do not prevent the children's division from taking
appropriate action under other laws of this state.
453.714. 1. A person may not solicit or advertise to:
(1) Identify a person to which to make a transfer of custody in violation of
subsection 1 of section 453.710;
(2) Identify a child for a transfer of custody in violation of subsection 3 of section
453.710; or
(3) Act as an intermediary in a transfer of custody in violation of subsection 3 of
section 453.710.
2. Violation of this section is a class B misdemeanor.
453.716. A law enforcement agency may investigate a possible violation of
sections 453.706 to 453.714 and take legal action as provided by law of this state.
453.718. In sections 453.718 to 453.732, "prospective adoptive parent" means an
individual who has been approved or permitted under other law of this state to adopt a
child.
453.720. Sections 453.718 to 453.732 apply to placement for adoption of a child
who:

HB 1888 14
(1) Has been or is in foster or institutional care;
(2) Previously has been adopted in a state;
(3) Has been or is being adopted under the law of a foreign country;
(4) Has come or is coming to a state from a foreign country to be adopted; or
(5) Is not a citizen of the United States.
453.722. Within a reasonable time before a child-placing agency places a child
for adoption with a prospective adoptive parent, the agency shall provide or cause to be
provided to the prospective adoptive parent general adoption information. The
information must address:
(1) Possible physical, mental, emotional, and behavioral issues concerning:
(a) Identity, loss, and trauma that a child might experience before, during, or
after adoption; and
(b) A child leaving familiar ties and surroundings;
(2) The effect that access to resources, including health insurance, may have on
the ability of an adoptive parent to meet the needs of a child;
(3) Causes of disruption of an adoptive placement or dissolution of an adoption
and resources available to help avoid disruption or dissolution; and
(4) Prohibitions under sections 453.710 and 453.714.
453.724. 1. Except as prohibited by other law of this state, within a reasonable
time before a child-placing agency places a child for adoption with a prospective
adoptive parent, the agency shall provide or cause to be provided to the prospective
adoptive parent information specific to the child that is known to or reasonably
obtainable by the agency and material to the prospective adoptive parent’s informed
decision to adopt the child. The information must include:
(1) The child's family, cultural, racial, religious, ethnic, linguistic, and
educational background;
(2) The child's physical, mental, emotional, and behavioral health;
(3) Circumstances that might adversely affect the child's physical, mental,
emotional, or behavioral health;
(4) The child's medical history, including immunizations;
(5) The medical history of the child's genetic parents and siblings;
(6) The history of an adoptive or out-of-home placement of the child and the
reason the adoption or placement ended;
(7) The child's United States immigration status;
(8) Medical, therapeutic, and educational resources, including language-
acquisition training, available to the adoptive parent and child after placement for

HB 1888 15
adoption or adoption to assist in responding effectively to physical, mental, emotional,
or behavioral health issues; and
(9) Available records relevant to the information in subdivisions (1) through (8)
of this subsection.
2. If, before an adoption is finalized, additional information under subsection 1
of this section that is material to a prospective adoptive parent's informed decision to
adopt the child becomes known to or reasonably obtainable by the child-placing agency,
the agency shall provide the information to the prospective adoptive parent.
3. If, after an adoption is finalized, additional information under subsection 1 of
this section becomes known to the child-placing agency, the agency shall make a
reasonable effort to provide the information to the adoptive parent.
453.726. 1. A child-placing agency placing a child for adoption shall provide or
cause to be provided to the prospective adoptive parent guidance and instruction
specific to the child to help prepare the parent to respond effectively to needs of the child
that are known to or reasonably ascertainable by the agency.
2. The guidance and instruction under subsection 1 of this section must address,
if applicable:
(1) The potential effect on the child of:
(a) A previous adoption or out-of-home placement;
(b) Multiple previous adoptions or out-of-home placements;
(c) Trauma, insecure attachment, fetal alcohol exposure, or malnutrition;
(d) Neglect, abuse, drug exposure, or similar adversity;
(e) Separation from a sibling or significant caregiver; and
(f) A difference in ethnicity, race, or cultural identity between the child and the
prospective adoptive parent or other child of the parent;
(2) Information available from the federal government on the process for the
child to acquire United States citizenship; and
(3) Any other matter the child-placing agency considers material to the
adoption.
3. The guidance and instruction under subsection 1 of this section must be
provided:
(1) For adoption of a child residing in the United States, a reasonable time before
the adoption is finalized; or
(2) For an intercountry adoption, in accordance with federal law.
453.728. On request of a child who was placed for adoption or the child's
adoptive parent, the child-placing agency placing the child or the children's division
shall provide information about how to obtain financial assistance or support services:

HB 1888 16
(1) To assist the child or parent to respond effectively to adjustment, behavioral
health, and other challenges; and
(2) To help preserve the placement or adoption.
453.730. 1. A law enforcement agency may investigate an allegation that a child-
placing agency has failed to comply with sections 453.718 to 453.732 and commence an
action for injunctive or other relief or initiate an administrative proceeding against the
child-placing agency to enforce sections 453.718 to 453.732.
2. The children's division may initiate a proceeding to determine whether a
child-placing agency has failed to comply with sections 453.718 to 453.732. If the
children's division finds that the child-placing agency has failed to comply, the
children's division may suspend or revoke the agency's license or take other action
permitted by law of this state.
453.732. The children's division may adopt rules under chapter 536 to
implement sections 453.722, 453.724, and 453.728.
453.734. In applying and construing this uniform act, a court shall consider the
promotion of uniformity of the law among jurisdictions that enact it.
453.736. Sections 453.700 to 453.740 modify, limit, or supersede the Electronic
Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001 et seq., as
amended, but do not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. Section 7001(c), or authorize
electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b).
453.738. 1. Sections 453.706 to 453.716 apply to:
(1) A transfer of custody on or after August 28, 2026; and
(2) Soliciting or advertising on or after August 28, 2026.
2. Sections 453.718 to 453.732 apply to placement of a child for adoption more
than sixty days after August 28, 2026.
453.740. If a provision of sections 453.700 to 453.740 or its application to a
person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect another provision
or application that can be given effect without the invalid provision.
453.742. Sections 453.700 to 453.740 supplement the provisions under this
chapter and chapter 210 for the transfer of custody of a child. To the extent the
provisions under this chapter or chapter 210 are inconsistent with sections 453.700 to
453.740, the provisions of sections 453.700 to 453.740 control regarding the transfer of
custody of a child.

HB 1888 17
487.110. The uniform child custody jurisdiction and enforcement act, as enacted in
sections [452.440 to 452.550] 452.700 to 452.930, shall apply to all child custody
proceedings, as defined in section 452.705, in the family court.
✔